apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="ný__n">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ið</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ið</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inu</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jum</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>junum</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sins</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ja</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>janna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="send/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unni</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>na</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nanna</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="j/arl__n">
      <e>       <p><l>arl</l>       <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlinn</l>    <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlar</l>     <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlarnir</l>  <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arl</l>       <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlinn</l>    <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arla</l>      <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlana</l>    <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arli</l>      <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlinum</l>   <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örlum</l>     <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örlunum</l>   <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arls</l>      <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlsins</l>   <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arla</l>      <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arlanna</l>   <r>arl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kunt/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unni</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unnar</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nanna</l>     <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ný">              <i>ný</i><par n="ný__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarl">            <i>j</i><par n="j/arl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunta">           <i>kunt</i><par n="kunt/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="breska">          <i>bresk</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kymríska">        <i>kymrísk</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elska">           <i>elsk</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ugla">            <i>ugl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sápa">            <i>sáp</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rotta">           <i>rott</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súpa">            <i>súp</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læða">            <i>læð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þota">            <i>þot</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyrta">          <i>skyrt</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senda">           <i>send</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benda">           <i>bend</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lenda">           <i>lend</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koma">            <i>kom</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bringa">          <i>bring</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blíða">           <i>blíð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="regla">           <i>regl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perla">           <i>perl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þoka">            <i>þok</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hryssa">          <i>hryss</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hola">            <i>hol</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pláneta">         <i>plánet</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="púma">            <i>púm</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grákráka">        <i>grákrák</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kráka">           <i>krák</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="unnusta">         <i>unnust</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þjónusta">        <i>þjónust</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orrusta">         <i>orrust</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gola">            <i>gol</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuglaglæða">      <i>fuglaglæð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bólga">           <i>bólg</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mænukylfa">       <i>mænukylf</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vala">            <i>val</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bókfinka">        <i>bókfink</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjallafinka">     <i>fjallafink</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="móða">            <i>móð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aðfinnsla">       <i>aðfinnsl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framleiðsla">     <i>framleiðsl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="útbreiðsla">      <i>útbreiðsl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kennsla">         <i>kennsl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reynsla">         <i>reynsl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áhersla">         <i>áhersl</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belgbólga">       <i>belgbólg</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blóðfruma">       <i>blóðfrum</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umræða">          <i>umræð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eyða">            <i>eyð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="breyta">          <i>breyt</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finka">           <i>fink</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flétta">          <i>flétt</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="álma">            <i>álm</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hræða">           <i>hræð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="húfa">            <i>húf</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agúrka">          <i>agúrk</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="æða">             <i>æð</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fela">            <i>fel</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taugafruma">      <i>taugafrum</i><par n="send/a__n"/></e>
